Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 1. Powers.

Sec. 24.05.010.
Legislative power.

The legislative power of the state is vested in the legislature of the State of Alaska and extends to all rightful subjects of legislation not inconsistent with or reserved by the constitution of the State of Alaska and the constitution and laws of the United States.

History.

(§ 1 ch 157 SLA 1959)

Cross references. —

For related constitutional provisions, see Alaska Const., art. II, § 1.

Collateral references. —

72 Am. Jur. 2d, States, Territories, and Dependencies, §§ 35-61

73 Am. Jur. 2d, Statutes, §§ 33, 34.

81A C.J.S., States, § 40.